apertium-unm.unm.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Unami

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <vaux>   # Preverb ("verbal auxiliary")
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral
# <cnjcoo> # coordinating conjunction
# <cnjsub> # subordinating conjunction
# <det>    # determiner
# <np>     # proper noun
# <mod>    # "modal word" (discourse particles)
# <qst>    # polar question particle
# <pr>     # preposition
# <prn>    # pronoun
# <adv>    # adverb

# verb subcategories
# <tv>     # transitive
# <iv>     # intransitive

# proper noun subcategories
# <ant>    # anthroponym (personal name)
# <cog>    # cogonem (family name)
# <top>    # toponym (place name)

# pronoun subcategories
# <pers>   # personal
# <itg>    # interrogative

# Verb grammatical tags
# - subject person
# <s_1sg>
# <s_2sg>
# <s_3sg>
# <s_11pl>
# <s_12pl>
# <s_2pl>
# <s_3pl>
# - object person
# <o_1sg>
# <o_2sg>
# <o_3sg>
# <o_11pl>
# <o_12pl>
# <o_2pl>
# <o_3pl>
# - tense
# <past>    # Past
# <subord>  # Subordinative
# <cnj>     # Conjunct
# <sbj>     # Subjunctive
# - other
# <neg>     # Negative

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>  # Plural
# <sg>  # Singular

# Animacy
# <aa>  # Animate
# <nn>  # Inanimate

# Noun grammatical tags
## possession
# <px1sg>	
# <px2sg>
# <px3sg>
# <px11pl>
# <px12pl>
# <px2pl>
# <px3pl>
#
## case
# <abs>   # Absentative
# <obv>   # Obviative
# <loc>   # Locative

# Other symbols
# >      # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS

Nouns
Verbs
Punctuation
AdjRoot
AdvRoot
PrepRoot
IjRoot
DetRoot
PronRoot
NumberRoot
CnjLex(1) CnjLex(2):
Misc
Number

NumberRoot [+:] Nouns # Dir/LR

PATTERN Nouns

NounRoot-Anim NounInfl-Anim
NounRoot-Inan NounInfl-Inan

NounRoot-Family(1) [ <n><voc>: ]

N-Poss(1) NounRoot-Family(2) [ <n>: ] N-Poss(2) N-Poss(3): [ <pl>:{A}k ]?
# Just put a -k after "our", e.g, nichanenak


PATTERN Verbs


# FIXME: need separate tags for (main)/subordinate/conjunct/etc.

# (main)

## Intransitive
( PrePreVerbStuff )? :VerbInflAI(1) Preverbs? VerbRootAI(1) [<v>:] VerbRootAI(2): :VerbInflAI(2) VerbInflAI(3):
## Transitive Inanimate
:VerbInflTI(1) Preverbs? VerbRootTI(1) [<v>:] VerbRootTI(2): :VerbInflTI(2) VerbInflTI(3):
## Transitive Animate
:VerbInflTA(1) Preverbs? VerbRootTA(1) [<v>:] VerbRootTA(2): :VerbInflTA(2) VerbInflTA(3):


# Subordinate

## Intransitive
( PrePreVerbStuff )? :VerbInflAISub(1) PreverbsSub? VerbRootAI(1) [<v>:] VerbRootAI(2): :VerbInflAISub(2) [<subord>:] VerbInflAISub(3):


:VerbInflTASub(1) PreverbsSub? VerbRootTA(1) [<v>:] VerbRootTA(2): :VerbInflTASub(2) [<subord>:] VerbInflTASub(3):

# Conjunct

## Intransitive
( PrePreVerbStuff )? VerbRootAI(1) [<v>:] VerbRootAI(2): :VerbInflAICnj(1) [<cnj>:] VerbInflAICnj(2):
## Transitive Inanimate
( PrePreVerbStuff )? VerbRootTI(1) [<v>:] VerbRootTI(2): :VerbInflTICnj(1) [<cnj>:] VerbInflTICnj(2):


# Subjunctive

## Intransitive
VerbRootAI(1) [<v>:] VerbRootAI(2): :VerbInflAISubj(1) [<sbj>:] VerbInflAISubj(2):
## Transitive Inanimate
VerbRootTI(1) [<v>:] VerbRootTI(2): :VerbInflTISubj(1) [<sbj>:] VerbInflTISubj(2):


LEXICON PrePreVerbStuff

kahti<adv>+:kahti>
ènta<cnjsub>+:ènta>

PATTERN AdjRoot

AdjLex [<adj>:] AdjMorph
AdjLex-Cooking [<adj>:] AdjMorph
AdjLex-Cooking [<adj><??>:sasik]  # ! FIXME: what are these forms?

( [ ènta<cnjsub>+:ènta ] )? AdjLex [<v><ii>:] :VerbInflIICnj(1) [<cnj>:] VerbInflIICnj(2):


PATTERN AdvRoot

AdvLex [<adv>:]

PATTERN PrepRoot

Prepositions [<pr>:]

PATTERN IjRoot

IjLex [<ij>:]

PATTERN NumberRoot

NumberLex [<num>:]



LEXICON AdjMorph

# FIXME: actually verbs

<aa><pred><sg>:>su
<aa><pred><pl>:>su>{y}{A}k

<nn><pred><sg>:>e
<nn><pred><pl>:>e>{y}{A}

<aa><attr><sg>:>sit
<aa><attr><pl>:>sitch>ik # Dir/LR
<aa><attr><pl>:>sich>ik

<nn><attr><sg>:>e
<nn><attr><sg>:>ek        # Dir/LR  FIXME: conjunct!
<nn><attr><sg>:>ek>e      # Dir/LR  FIXME: subjunctive!
<nn><attr><pl>:>e>{y}{A}
<nn><attr><pl>:>e>{y}{A}k # Dir/LR  FIXME: CHECK


PATTERN PreverbsSub

PreverbSub-Lex

LEXICON PreverbSub-Lex

teli<cnjsub>+:teli\     # "so that"
tili<cnjsub>+:tili\     # "when, that, so that, as"

PATTERN Preverbs

Preverb-Lex ([hëch<qst>+:hëch\ ])?
Preverb-Lex ([hëch<qst>+:hàch\ ])? # Dir/LR

LEXICON Preverb-Lex

kati<vaux>+:kati\       # "almost (do)"
kata<vaux>+:kata\       # "want to (do)"       FIXME: p3 is kota/kahta
shinki<vaux>+:shinki\   # "dislike/hate to"
alemi<vaux>+:{t}{_w}alemi\  # "begin"
tala<vaux>+:{t}ala\     # "cannot, be unable to"
kàski<vaux>+:kàski\     # "can, be able to"
kìshi<vaux>+:kìshi\     # "finish"


LEXICON NounInfl-Anim

<n><aa><sg>:
<n><aa><sg><loc>:>{I}nk
<n><aa><sg><gen>:>i
<n><aa><pl>:>{y}{A}k
<n><aa><sp><obv>:>{y}{A}


LEXICON NounInfl-Inan

<n><nn><sg>:
<n><nn><sg><loc>:>{I}nk
<n><aa><sg><gen>:>i
<n><nn><pl>:>{y}{A}

LEXICON VerbInflIICnj(2)  # Conjunct

:>ek        <s_3sg>:


LEXICON VerbInflAI(3)

:{N}{e}>   :>{½}          <s_1sg>
:ni\ >     :>{½}          <s_1sg>        # Dir/LR
:n'>       :>{½}          <s_1sg>        # Dir/LR
:{k}{e}>   :>{½}          <s_2sg>
:ki\ >     :>{½}          <s_2sg>        # Dir/LR
:k'>       :>{½}          <s_2sg>        # Dir/LR
:          :>{³}          <s_3sg>        # technically -w (?)
:{N}{e}>   :>{½}>hëna     <s_11pl>  # technically -hm-nan (MP-1.pl)
:ni\ >     :>{½}>hëna     <s_11pl>  # Dir/LR
:n'>       :>{½}>hëna     <s_11pl>  # Dir/LR
:{N}{e}>   :>{½}>hënuk    <s_11pl><coll>
:{k}{e}>   :>{½}>hëna     <s_12pl>
:{k}{e}>   :>{½}>hënuk    <s_12pl><coll>
# TODO: nëmitsahtihënuk (-ahti- "all")
# TODO: ktëlsahtihënuk (")
# TODO: kënewtihënuk (-ëti- RECIP)
:ki\ >     :>{½}>hëna     <s_12pl>  # Dir/LR
:ki\ >     :>{½}>hëna     <2_12pl>  # Dir/LR
:{k}{e}>   :>{½}>hëmo     <s_2pl>
:          :>{³}>{y}{A}k  <s_3pl>        # -w-ak (3-pl.anim)
:          :>{³}ltu>{y}{A}k  <s_3pl><coll>        # -w-ak (3-pl.anim)


:{N}{e}>   :>{½}>{u}{ʍ}{i}          <neg><s_1sg>
:{k}{e}>   :>{½}>{u}{ʍ}{i}          <neg><s_2sg>
:          :>{³}>{u}{ʍ}{i}          <neg><s_3sg>        # technically -w (?)
:{N}{e}>   :>{½}>{u}hùmëna          <neg><s_11pl>       # technically -hm-nan (MP-1.pl)
:{k}{e}>   :>{½}>{u}hùmëna          <neg><s_12pl>
:{k}{e}>   :>{½}>{u}hùmo            <neg><s_2pl>
:          :>{³}>{u}{ʍ}{i}>{y}{A}k  <neg><s_3pl>        # -w-ak (3-pl.anim)

:          :                       <imp><s_2sg>:
:          :>{i}{l}                <imp><s_2sg>:  # Dir/LR
:          :>{u}kw                 <imp><s_2pl>:
:          :>{u}tam                <imp><s_1du>:
:          :>{u}tam>{u}kw          <imp><s_1pl>:
#:          :>tam          <opt><s_1pl>

LEXICON VerbInflAISub(3)   # Subordinative

:{N}{e}>   >{½}>{e}n     <s_1sg>
:{k}{e}>   >{½}>{e}n     <s_2sg>
:{w}{e}>   >{₃}>{e}n     <s_3sg>
:{N}{e}>   >{½}>{e}nen   <s_11pl>
:{k}{e}>   >{½}>{e}nen   <s_12pl>
:{k}{e}>   >{½}>{e}neyo  <s_2pl>
:{w}{e}>   >{₃}>{e}neyo  <s_3pl>

LEXICON VerbInflAICnj(2)  # Conjunct

:>{½}>a{n}   <s_1sg>
:>{½}>an     <s_2sg>
:>{₃}>{K}    <s_3sg>
:>{½}>enkw   <s_11pl>
:>{½}>enk    <s_11pl>  # Dir/LR
:>{½}>ankw   <s_12pl>
:>{½}>ekw    <s_2pl>
:>{₃}>htit   <s_3pl>

:>{½}>{u}w>a{n}   <neg><s_1sg>
:>{½}>{u}w>an     <neg><s_2sg>
:>{₃}>{u}>kw      <neg><s_3sg>
:>{½}>{u}w>enk    <neg><s_11pl>
:>{½}>{u}w>ankw   <neg><s_12pl>
:>{½}>{u}w>ekw    <neg><s_2pl>
:>{₃}>hëtikw      <neg><s_3pl>



LEXICON VerbInflAISubj(2)  # Subjunctive

:>{½}>a{n}>e   <s_1sg>
:>{½}>an>e     <s_2sg>
:>{₃}>t>e      <s_3sg>
:>{½}>enkw>e   <s_11pl>
:>{½}>enk>e    <s_11pl>  # Dir/LR
:>{½}>ankw>e   <s_12pl>
:>{½}>ekw>e    <s_2pl>
:>{₃}>htit>e   <s_3pl>

:>{½}>a{n}>pàn>e   <pst><s_1sg>
:>{½}>an>pàn>e     <pst><s_2sg>
:>{₃}>t>pàn>e      <pst><s_3sg>
:>{½}>enkw>pàn>e   <pst><s_11pl>
:>{½}>enk>pàn>e    <pst><s_11pl>  # Dir/LR
:>{½}>ankw>pàn>e   <pst><s_12pl>
:>{½}>ekw>pàn>e    <pst><s_2pl>
:>{₃}>htit>pàn>e   <pst><s_3pl>

:>{½}>{u}w>a{n}>e   <neg><s_1sg>
:>{½}>{u}w>an>e     <neg><s_2sg>
:>{₃}>{u}>kw>e      <neg><s_3sg>
:>{½}>{u}w>enk>e    <neg><s_11pl>
:>{½}>{u}w>ankw>e   <neg><s_12pl>
:>{½}>{u}w>ekw>e    <neg><s_2pl>
:>{₃}>hëtikw>e      <neg><s_3pl>


#LEXICON VerbInflIntrImp(2)

LEXICON VerbInflTI(3)

# bare (indefinite object)
:{N}{e}>   :>{½}                <s_1sg>:
:{k}{e}>   :>{½}                <s_2sg>:
:          :>{₃}                <s_3sg>:
:{N}{e}>   :>{½}>{ù}h{u}{m}ëna  <s_11pl>:
:{k}{e}>   :>{½}>{ù}h{u}{m}ëna  <s_12pl>:
:{k}{e}>   :>{½}>{ù}h{Ë}mo      <s_2pl>:
:          :>{₃}>{y}{A}k        <s_3pl>:

:{N}{e}>   >{e}n          <s_1sg><o_sg>
:{N}{e}>   >{e}n>a        <s_1sg><o_pl>
:{k}{e}>   >{e}n          <s_2sg><o_sg>
:{k}{e}>   >{e}n>a        <s_2sg><o_pl>
:{w}{e}>   >{e}n>a        <s_3sg><o_sg>
:{w}{e}>   >{e}n>a        <s_3sg><o_pl>
:{N}{e}>   >{e}nën        <s_11pl><o_sg>
:{N}{e}>   >{e}nën>a      <s_11pl><o_pl>
:{k}{e}>   >{e}nën        <s_12pl><o_sg>
:{k}{e}>   >{e}nën>a      <s_12pl><o_pl>
:{k}{e}>   >{e}n>eyo      <s_2pl><o_sg>
:{k}{e}>   >{e}n>eyo      <s_2pl><o_pl>
:{w}{e}>   >{e}n>eyo      <s_3pl><o_sg>
:{w}{e}>   >{e}n>eyo      <s_3pl><o_pl>
#:{k}{e}>   >en>eyo        <s_2pl><o_sg>
#:{k}{e}>   >en>eyo        <s_2pl><o_pl>
#:{w}       >en>eyo        <s_3pl><o_sg>
#:{w}       >en>eyo        <s_3pl><o_pl>



:{N}{e}>   >{u}{ʍ}{i}>{e}n          <neg><s_1sg><o_sg>
:{N}{e}>   >{u}{ʍ}{i}>{e}n>a        <neg><s_1sg><o_pl>
:{k}{e}>   >{u}{ʍ}{i}>{e}n          <neg><s_2sg><o_sg>
:{k}{e}>   >{u}{ʍ}{i}>{e}n>a        <neg><s_2sg><o_pl>
:{w}{e}>   >{u}{ʍ}{i}>{e}n          <neg><s_3sg><o_sg>
:{w}{e}>   >{u}{ʍ}{i}>{e}n>a        <neg><s_3sg><o_pl>
:{N}{e}>   >{u}{ʍ}{i}>{e}nen        <neg><s_11pl><o_sg>
:{N}{e}>   >{u}{ʍ}{i}>{e}nen>a      <neg><s_11pl><o_pl>
:{k}{e}>   >{u}{ʍ}{i}>{e}nen        <neg><s_12pl><o_sg>
:{k}{e}>   >{u}{ʍ}{i}>{e}nen>a      <neg><s_12pl><o_pl>
:{k}{e}>   >{u}{ʍ}{i}>{e}n>eyo      <neg><s_2pl>
:{w}{e}>   >{u}{ʍ}{i}>{e}n>eyo      <neg><s_3pl>


LEXICON VerbInflTICnj(2)  # Conjunct

:>{½}>a           <s_1sg>
:>{½}>an          <s_2sg>
:>{³}>{K}         <s_3sg>      # FIXME: penam>{½}>ank → penank
:>{½}>enkw        <s_11pl>
:>{½}>ankw        <s_12pl>
:>{½}>ekw         <s_2pl>
:>{³}>{ì}htit     <s_3pl>   # {i}:i after m

LEXICON VerbInflTISubj(2)  # Subjunctive

:>{½}>a{n}>e      <s_1sg>
:>{½}>an>e        <s_2sg>
:>{³}>{K}>e       <s_3sg>      # FIXME: penam>{½}>ank → penank
:>{½}>enkw>e      <s_11pl>
:>{½}>ankw>e      <s_12pl>
:>{½}>ekw>e       <s_2pl>
:>{³}>{ì}htit>e   <s_3pl>   # {i}:i after m

:>{½}>a{n}>pàn>e      <pst><s_1sg>
:>{½}>ant>pàn>e       <pst><s_2sg>
:>{³}>{K}>pàn>e       <pst><s_3sg>      # FIXME: penam>{½}>ank → penank
:>{½}>enkw>pàn>e      <pst><s_11pl>
:>{½}>ankw>pàn>e      <pst><s_12pl>
:>{½}>ekw>pàn>e       <pst><s_2pl>
:>{³}>{ì}htit>pàn>e   <pst><s_3pl>   # {i}:i after m

LEXICON VerbInflTA(3)
